Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,146
Incarceration work camp; costs.

All costs incurred during the period the offender is committed to an incarceration work camp shall be the responsibility of the state, including the cost of transporting the offender to the incarceration work camp and for returning the offender to the appropriate Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility if the offender is discharged for unsatisfactory performance from the incarceration work camp.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 29;

Laws 2007, LB83, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB340, § 6.